South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3944.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-4160 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (N) Any motor vehicle that is primarily powered by means of an electric battery shall be allowed to exceed the gross, single axle, tandem axle, or bridge formula weight limits, including tolerances, by no more than two thousand pounds each individually weighed, up to a maximum gross vehicle weight of eighty-two thousand pounds. This provision also applies on the interstate as allowed by federal law. (O) The exception provided in subsection (N) shall expire on July 1, 2030. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----